California, session 20252026, AB496.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3309 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:3309. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature that evaluates the quality of services provided by the department to the public with regard to unemployment and disability insurance. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a review of paid family leave and service wait times. (b) (1) A report pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.